Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MOBILE CRISIS GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for mobile crisis grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4661, subdivision 9, paragraph (b), clause (15), for mobile crisis teams to purchase and renovate vehicles to provide protected transport under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0625, subdivision 17, paragraph (l), clause (6). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end